Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-287
Trap-and-trace device, defined.

Trap-and-trace device means a device which captures the incoming electronic or other impulses which identify the originating number of an instrument or device from which a wire or electronic communication was transmitted.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 149.